Tennessee, session 114, HB0815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before January 1, 2026, the department of safety shall report to the
transportation and safety committee of the senate and the committee in the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over driver license matters on the extent to which current
fees imposed on applications for an original or renewal of a driver license are used to offset
processing costs for driver license issuance and reinstatements, information technology
upgrades, and any ongoing costs to maintain the driver license issuance system.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0815
002533
- 1 -